Massachusetts, session 194th, H5009.
Be it enacted by the People, and by their authority, as follows:
1 SECTION 1: Section 1 of chapter 150E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding to the end of the seventh paragraph, titled
3 "Employer" or "public employer", the following sentence: "In the case of employees of the
4 committee for public counsel services, employer shall mean the committee for public counsel
5 services or its designee."
6 SECTION 2. Section 7 of said chapter 150E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
7 hereby amended by striking the word "or" before the phrase "the state lottery commission" in
8 line 16 and adding the following words after that phrase: "or the committee for public counsel
9 services."
10 SECTION 3. Said section 7 of said chapter 150E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
11 hereby amended by striking the word "and" before the words "the state lottery commission"
12 appearing in line 34 and inserting after the word "commission" in line 35 the following words:
13 "and committee for public counsel services."
2 of 5

FIRST TEN SIGNERS
NAME RESIDENCE CITY OR TOWN
Vicki Jean McAuley 137 Indian Trail Pembroke
John J. Magner 28 Woodlock Road Hingham
Jayne Fogarty 254 Walnut Street Barnstable
William Bonnetti 254 Walnut Street Barnstable
Charles Joseph Gillen, Jr. 414 John Mahar Highway, #307 Braintree
Neil O’Brien 33 Woodcrest Drive Wakefield
Kathryn M. O’Brien 33 Woodcrest Drive Wakefield
MaryBeth O’Brien 33 Woodcrest Drive Wakefield
Mark Bernard Davern 105 Constitution Avenue Weymouth
Thomas Michael McKeever 27 Curtis Road Hanover
3 of 5

CERTIFICATE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
September 3, 2025.
Honorable William Francis Galvin
Secretary of the Commonwealth
One Ashburton Place, Room 1705
Boston, Massachusetts 02108
Re: Initiative Petition No. 25-22: Initiative Petition for a Law Relative to
Labor Relations Policies for Committee for Public Counsel Services Employees
Dear Secretary Galvin:
In accordance with the provisions of Article 48 of the Amendments to
the Massachusetts Constitution, I have reviewed the above-referenced initiative
petition, which was submitted to me on or before the first Wednesday of August
of this year.
I hereby certify that this measure is in proper form for submission to
the people; that the measure is not, either affirmatively or negatively,
substantially the same as any measure which has been qualified for submission
or submitted to the people at either of the two preceding biennial state elections;
and that it contains only subjects that are related or are mutually dependent and
which are not excluded from the initiative process pursuant to Article 48, the
Initiative, Part 2, Section 2.
In accordance with Article 48, I enclose a fair, concise summary of the
measure.
Sincerely,
ANDREA JOY CAMPBELL,
Attorney General.
4 of 5

SUMMARY OF 25-22
This proposed law would specify that employees of the Committee for Public Counsel
Services (“CPCS”) are permitted to engage in collective bargaining with their employer. It would
also require CPCS, after executing a collective bargaining agreement, to request the
appropriation necessary to fund such agreement from the Governor.
5 of 5